North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 5A. Natural Heritage Trust Program. [Repealed]

§§ 113-77.6 through 113-77.9.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.3(b), effective August 1, 2013.

History.

S. 113-77.6; 1987, c. 871, s. 1; 1989, c. 86, s. 1; c. 727, s. 218(56); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 772, s. 3; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); repealed by 2013-360, s. 14.3(b), effective August 1, 2013. s. 113-77.7; 1987, c. 871, s. 1; 1989, c. 86, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 772, s. 3; 1997-366, s. 1; 2004-179, s. 3.5; repealed by 2013-360, s. 14.3(b), effective August 1, 2013. s. 113-77.8; 1987, c. 871, s. 1; 1989, c. 86, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 772, s. 3; 1995, c. 490, s. 37(a); 2001-486, s. 2.23(a); repealed by 2013-360, s. 14.3(b), effective August 1, 2013. s. 113-77.9; 1987, c. 871, s. 1; 1989, c. 86, s. 1; 1991, c. 689, s. 339; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 66; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 772, s. 3; 1997-366, s. 2; 1998-212, s. 14.6(b); 2004-179, s. 3.4; 2007-323, s. 29.14(g); 2009-484, s. 14; 2011-145, s. 13.16; 2012-142, s. 12.10; 2012-145, s. 4.4; repealed by 2013-360, s. 14.3(b), effective August 1, 2013; amended by Session Laws 2014-3, s. 14.14(b).